Utah statutes.
34-29-17.   Religious or charitable associations excepted from chapter.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall be construed so as to require any religious or charitable association which may assist in procuring situations or employment for persons seeking the same to obtain a license therefor.



Enacted by Chapter 85, 1969 General Session

